devtools/testdata/inspect/insert_space.regex
# edits that are so specific we may allow them to occur any number of times
# (they will occur only once or twice anyway)
# insert space after punctuation marks; around hyphen
[
[ "" -> " "::1   ||  [%.]          _ \[%. | " "] ] | 
[ "" -> " "::1   ||  [%,|%:|%?|%!] _ \[" "]      ] |
[ "" -> " "::1   ||  [%-]          _ \[" "]      ] |
[ "" -> " "::1   || \[" "]         _  [%-]       ] |
["-" -> " - "::1 || \[" "]         _ \[" "]      ]
]*
;
